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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The Engine and ECT ECU detects the signal from the transfer neutral position switch.
This DTC indicates that the transfer neutral position switch remains ON.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0818

Transfer neutral position switch remains ON while vehicle run-
ningunderconditions for30sec. (2 −tripdetection logic)
SVehiclespeed is25km/hormore
STransfershift position isH

SShort in transferneutralpositionswitchcircuit
STransferneutralpositionswitch
SEngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transfer neutral position switch.

PREPARATION:
Remove the transfer neutral position switch.
CHECK:
Check the continuity between the switch terminals when push-
ing the ball at the tip of the switch.
OK:

Switch Specified condition

Push Continuity

Free No continuity

NG Replace transfer neutral position switch.

OK

2 Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU and transfer neu-
tral position switch, transfer neutral position switch and body ground (See page
IN−38).

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT
ECU(See page IN−38).


